Utah statutes.
31A-37-106.   Authority to make rules -- Authority to issue orders.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commissioner may adopt rules to:
(a)  determine circumstances under which a branch captive insurance company is
not required to be a pure captive insurance company;
(b) require a statement, document, or information that a captive insurance
company must provide to the commissioner to obtain a certificate of authority;
(c)  determine a factor a captive insurance company shall provide evidence of
under Subsection 31A-37-202(4)(c);
(d)  prescribe one or more capital requirements for a captive insurance
company in addition to those required under Section 31A-37-204 based on the
type, volume, and nature of insurance business transacted by the captive
insurance company;
(e)  establish:
(i)  the amount of capital or surplus required to be retained under Subsection
31A-37-205(4) at the payment of a dividend or other distribution by a captive
insurance company; or
(ii)  a formula to determine the amount described in Subsection 31A-37-205(4);
(f)  waive or modify a requirement for public notice and hearing for the
following by a captive insurance company:
(i)  merger;
(ii)  consolidation;
(iii)  conversion;
(iv)  mutualization; or
(v)  redomestication;
(g)  approve the use of one or more reliable methods of valuation and rating
for:
(i)  an association captive insurance company;
(ii)  a sponsored captive insurance company; or
(iii)  an industrial insured group;
(h)  prohibit or limit an investment that threatens the solvency or liquidity
of:
(i)  a pure captive insurance company; or
(ii)  an industrial insured captive insurance company;
(i)  determine the financial reports a sponsored captive insurance company
shall annually file with the commissioner;
(j) prescribe the required forms and reports under Section 31A-37-501; and
(k)  establish one or more standards to ensure that:
(i)  one of the following is able to exercise control of the risk management
function of a controlled unaffiliated business to be insured by a pure captive
insurance company:
(A)  a parent; or
(B)  an affiliated company of a parent; or
(ii)  one of the following is able to exercise control of the risk management
function of a controlled unaffiliated business to be insured by an industrial
insured captive insurance company:
(A)  an industrial insured; or
(B)  an affiliated company of the industrial insured.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(k), until the commissioner adopts the
rules authorized under Subsection (1)(k), the commissioner may by temporary
order grant authority to insure risks to:
(a)  a pure captive insurance company; or
(b)  an industrial insured captive insurance company.
(3)  The commissioner may issue prohibitory, mandatory, and other orders
relating to a captive insurance company as necessary to enable the
commissioner to secure compliance with this chapter.
